Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-17] Punishment prohibited before
trial. Subject to section 124A-83, no person, while being held for trial
or as the result of trial, may be subjected to punishment or penalty other than
arrest or confinement upon the charges pending against the person, nor shall
the arrest or confinement imposed upon the person be any more rigorous than the
circumstances require to insure the person's presence, but the person may be
subjected to minor punishment during that period for infractions of discipline.
[L 1982, c 171, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next